Tennessee, session 114, SB2699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 455 of the Private Acts of 1953, as amended by Chapter 136 of
the Private Acts of 1971, Chapter 121 of the Private Acts of 1986, Chapter 164 of the Private
Acts of 1998, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting Article V, Section
4 and substituting:
Section 4. Be it further enacted. The compensation of the Mayor and Council members
shall be established from time to time by ordinance duly adopted by the City Council,
subject to any limitations imposed by Tennessee law. No change in compensation shall
take effect during the term for which the Mayor or any Councilmember was elected;
however, such changes may take effect for subsequent terms of office.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Athens. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB2699
010787
- 1 -